Utah statutes.
41-1a-708.   Owner not liable for negligent operation after transfer.
The owner of a vehicle or vessel who has made a bona fide sale or transfer of
his title or interest and who has delivered to the purchaser or transferee
possession of the vehicle or vessel, the certificate of registration, and the
properly endorsed certificate of title to the vehicle or vessel is not liable
for any damages thereafter resulting from negligent operation of the vehicle
or vessel by another.
